Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1830
Office of public advocate; created; duties; appointment; qualifications.

(1) The office of public advocate is created as a separate and independent division within the commission. The public advocate shall represent the interests of Nebraska citizens and all classes of jurisdictional utility ratepayers, other than high-volume ratepayers, in matters involving jurisdictional utilities and shall act as trial staff before the commission. In the exercise of his or her powers, the public advocate shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the provision of safe, efficient, and reliable utility services at just and reasonable rates.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 75-105, the executive director of the commission, upon consultation with the members of the commission, shall appoint the public advocate. The public advocate shall serve a four-year term and shall be removed only for good cause. The executive director shall be responsible for reviewing the performance of the public advocate, for removing the public advocate in accordance with law, and for filling any vacancy in that position in the same manner as the original appointment.

(3) The public advocate shall be an attorney and shall have experience in consumer-related utility issues or in the operation, management, or regulation of utilities. No person owning stocks or bonds in a corporation subject in whole or in part to regulation by the commission or who has any pecuniary interest in such corporation shall be appointed as public advocate.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 30.